Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5668.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 4-1 of the General Laws entitled "Cruelty to Animals" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
4-1-44. Declawing cats prohibited.
(a) For purposes of this section:
(1) "Declawing" means an onychectomy or any other surgical procedure to amputate or
modify a portion of a cat's paw in order to remove the cat's claws. "Declawing" does not include
the trimming of nonviable claw husk or placing nonpermanent nail caps.
(2) "Tendonectomy" means a procedure in which the tendons to a cat's limbs, paws, or toes
are cut or modified in order that the normal functioning of the claws is impaired.
(3) "Therapeutic purpose" means a medically necessary procedure to address an existing
or recurring illness, infection, disease, injury, or abnormal condition in the claws, nail bed, or toe
bone, that compromises the cat's health. "Therapeutic purpose" shall not include a procedure
performed for a cosmetic or aesthetic purpose or to make the cat more convenient to keep or handle.
(b) It is unlawful for any person to perform surgical claw removal, declawing, or a
tendonectomy on any cat or otherwise alter a cat's toes, claws, or paws to prevent or impair the
normal function of the cat's toes, claws, or paws.
(c) This section does not apply to a procedure performed solely for a therapeutic purpose.
(d) The prosecution of and procedure for discipline for violations of this section shall be in
accordance with §§ 5-25-9 and 5-25-15.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on September 1, 2025.
========
LC001726/SUB A
========
LC001726/SUB A - Page 2 of 3